Arkansas, session 2025, SB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - DEPUTY PROSECUTING ATTORNEYS. There is
hereby established for Auditor of State - Deputy Prosecuting Attorneys for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SENIOR DEPUTY PROSECUTING ATTORNEY II 9 GRADE SPC10
(2) SENIOR DEPUTY PROSECUTING ATTORNEY I 23 GRADE SPC09
(3) DEP PROS ATTY - ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 30 GRADE SPC08
(4) DEP PROS ATTY - ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 39 GRADE SPC07
(5) DEP PROS ATTY - ATTORNEY 104 GRADE SPC05
(6) DEP PROS ATTY - ATTORNEY PART-TIME III 16 GRADE SPC05
*JAR030*
04-14-2025 11:41:50 JAR030

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB54
(7) DEP PROS ATTY - ATTORNEY PART-TIME II 14 GRADE SPC04
(8) DEP PROS ATTY - ATTORNEY PART-TIME I 54 GRADE SPC03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 289

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPUTY PROSECUTING ATTORNEYS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the State
Central Services Fund, for personal services and Special Deputy Expense
Allowance of the Deputy Prosecuting Attorneys for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $24,408,568
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 8,488,415
(03) SPECIAL DEPUTY EXPENSE ALLOWANCE 4,800
(04) LICENSURE EXPENSES 40,600
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $32,942,383

SECTION 3. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 4. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.
04-14-2025 11:41:50 JAR030

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB54

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee






















04-14-2025 11:41:50 JAR030